Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.140

Standards for biodiesel fuel/fuel blended with biodiesel fuel—Rules.

(1) The director shall adopt rules for maintaining standards for biodiesel fuel or fuel blended with biodiesel fuel by adopting all or part of the standards set forth in the Annual Book of ASTM Standards and supplements, amendments, or revisions thereof, all or part of the standards set forth in the National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) Handbook 130, Uniform Laws and Regulations in the areas of legal metrology and engine fuel quality rules, and any supplements, amendments, or revisions thereof, together with applicable federal environmental protection agency standards. The rules shall provide that the biodiesel refiner is responsible for meeting the ASTM standards required by chapter 338, Laws of 2006 when providing biodiesel fuel into the distribution system. If a conflict exists between federal environmental protection agency standards, ASTM standards, or NIST standards, for purposes of uniformity, federal environmental protection agency standards shall take precedence over ASTM and NIST standards. The department of agriculture shall not exceed ASTM standards for diesel.

(2) The rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section shall be updated to provide for fuel stability standards when national or international fuel stability standards have been adopted.

[ 2006 c 338 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2006 c 338: See note following RCW 19.112.110.